Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 6. The Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders.
of this act, by no less than 35 states, as provided in

§

53.1-176.2

. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice." As of July 1, 2004, the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders had been enacted by 35 states.